Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1984, 1990, 1995, 2008, and 2016 to make other minor word changes.

Administrative Code. —

For health and social services, see 7 AAC.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57(b), ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 changes made by ch. 16, SLA 2021, apply to minors subject to AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22, ch. 16, SLA 2021, and AS

47.12.100

“who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), the basis of a number of amendments to this title relating to juveniles and criminal justice, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.